Utah statutes.
41-6a-801.   Turning -- Manner -- Traffic-control devices.

The operator of a vehicle shall make turns as follows:

(1)  Right turns: both a right turn and an approach for a right turn shall be made as close as practical to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway.

(2)  Left turns:

(a)  the operator of a vehicle intending to turn left shall approach the turn from the extreme left-hand lane for traffic moving in the same direction;

(b)  whenever practicable, shall be made by turning onto the roadway being entered in the extreme left-hand lane for traffic moving in the new direction, unless otherwise directed by a traffic-control device; and

(c)  may be made on a highway across solid double yellow line pavement markings indicating a two-direction, no-passing zone.

(3)  Two-way left turn lanes:

(a)  where a two-way left turn lane is provided, a left turn may not be made from any other lane;

(b)  a vehicle may not be driven in the two-way left turn lane except when preparing for or making:

(i)  a left turn from or into the roadway; or

(ii)  a U-turn except when prohibited by a traffic-control device;

(c) (i)  except as provided under Subsection (3)(c)(ii), the operator of a vehicle intending to turn left may not enter a two-way left turn lane more than 500 feet prior to making the turn;

(ii)  if traffic in the two-way left turn lane extends beyond 500 feet, the operator of a vehicle intending to turn left may enter the two-way left turn lane immediately upon reaching the last vehicle in the two-way left turn lane;

(d)  the operator of a vehicle that has turned left into the two-way left turn lane may not travel in the lane more than 500 feet unless the operator intends to turn left and Subsection (3)(c)(ii) applies; and

(e)  the operator of a vehicle may not travel straight through an intersection in a two-way left turn lane. 

(4) (a) A highway authority in its jurisdiction may provide exceptions to the provisions of this section by erecting traffic-control devices directing a different course to be traveled by turning vehicles.

(b)  The operator of a vehicle may not turn a vehicle in violation of a traffic-control device erected under Subsection (4)(a).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

